Utah statutes.
20A-1-505.   Judicial vacancies -- Courts of record.
(1) (a)  When a vacancy occurs in a court of record, the governor shall,
within 30 days after receiving the list of nominees, fill the vacancy by
appointing a person who meets the qualifications for the office from a list of
at least three trial nominees and five appellate nominees certified to the
governor by the judicial nominating commission that has authority over the
vacancy.
(b)  If the governor fails to fill the vacancy within 30 days, the chief
justice of the Supreme Court shall, within 20 days, appoint a person who meets
the qualifications for the office from the list of nominees.
(2) (a)  The Senate shall:
(i)  consider and decide on each judicial appointment within 60 days of the
date of appointment; and
(ii)  if necessary, convene itself in extraordinary session to consider a
judicial appointment.
(b)  If the Senate fails to approve the appointment, the office is considered
vacant and a new nominating process begins.
(3)  An appointment is effective upon approval of a majority of all members of
the Senate.
(4)  The judicial nominating commission, the governor, the chief justice, and
the Senate shall nominate and select judges based solely upon consideration of
their fitness for office without regard to any partisan political
considerations.
